Maryland, session 2026, HB0202.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
SUBTITLE 59. SOCIAL ISOLATION AND LONELINESS PILOT GRANT PROGRAM.
13–5901.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0202*

HOUSE BILL 202
(B) “ELIGIBLE ENTITY” MEANS AN ENTITY OR ORGANIZATION THAT SERVES
PATIENTS, CLIENTS, OR PROGRAMMING PARTICIPANTS VULNERABLE TO THE
ADVERSE HEALTH EFFECTS OF SOCIAL ISOLATION AND LONELINESS, AS
DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(C) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE SOCIAL ISOLATION AND LONELINESS PILOT
GRANT PROGRAM.
13–5902.
(A) (1) THERE IS A SOCIAL ISOLATION AND LONELINESS PILOT GRANT
PROGRAM IN THE DEPARTMENT.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADMINISTER THE PROGRAM.
(B) THE PURPOSES OF THE PROGRAM ARE TO:
(1) EXAMINE THE IMPACT OF SOCIAL ISOLATION AND LONELINESS ON
VULNERABLE COMMUNITIES;
(2) ENCOURAGE PROGRAMMING TO ALLEVIATE THE ADVERSE
MENTAL AND PHYSICAL HEALTH EFFECTS CAUSED BY SOCIAL ISOLATION AND
LONELINESS;
(3) TARGET POPULATIONS IN THE STATE THAT ARE AT INCREASED
RISK FOR SOCIAL ISOLATION AND LONELINESS; AND
(4) INFORM FUTURE POLICY AND PROGRAMMING TO REDUCE SOCIAL
ISOLATION AND LONELINESS.
(C) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
PROGRAM SHALL AWARD A GRANT TO FIVE ELIGIBLE ENTITIES FOR THE OPERATING
COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH THE MAINTENANCE OR EXPANSION OF A PROGRAM THAT
TARGETS VULNERABLE POPULATIONS WITH SOCIOEMOTIONAL SUPPORT
ADDRESSING SOCIAL ISOLATION AND LONELINESS, INCLUDING VENUE FEES,
PERSONNEL COSTS, AND LICENSING FEES.
(2) THE PROGRAM, IN COLLABORATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF
AGING, THE GOVERNOR’S OFFICE FOR CHILDREN, AND THE DEPARTMENT OF
HOUSING AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT, SHALL PRIORITIZE YOUTH, SENIOR,
AND RURAL POPULATIONS WHEN AWARDING GRANTS TO ELIGIBLE ENTITIES.
(3) A GRANT AWARDED BY THE PROGRAM MAY NOT EXCEED $20,000.

HOUSE BILL 202 3
(D) AN ELIGIBLE ENTITY THAT RECEIVES A GRANT UNDER THIS SECTION
MAY NOT USE THE FUNDS FOR:
(1) RESEARCH OR DEVELOPMENT PROGRAMS; OR
(2) CAPITAL EXPENDITURES.
(E) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2028, THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE
ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF $100,000 FOR THE PROGRAM.
(F) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2029, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
CONDUCT AN EVALUATION OF THE PROGRAM AND REPORT ITS FINDINGS TO THE
GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE, TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY IN A REPORT THAT INCLUDES:
(1) AN ACCOUNTING OF FINANCIAL RECEIPTS AND EXPENDITURES;
(2) ANY PROGRESS MADE IN JURISDICTIONS THAT RECEIVED
PROGRAM GRANTS BASED ON THE OUTCOME METRICS PRODUCED BY THE GRANT
RECIPIENTS; AND
(3) THE IMPACT OF PROGRAM ACTIVITIES WITH RESPECT TO
TREATING AND SERVING PATIENTS, CLIENTS, AND PROGRAM PARTICIPANTS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 3 years and 6 months and, at the
end of March 31, 2030, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly,
shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.